Hawaii statutes.
[§11-354] Fundraising on state or
county property prohibited. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), no
person shall solicit a contribution in a government facility that is used for
the discharge of official duties by an officer or employee of the State or
county.

(b) The prohibition in subsection (a) shall
not apply to any government facility that permits use by nongovernmental
organizations for a fee or with reservations; provided that the government
facility's use rules do not prohibit political activities on the premises.
Government facilities that permit use for political activities shall be
available to a candidate, candidate committee, or noncandidate committee for
fundraising activities pursuant to the same terms and conditions that would otherwise
apply to use by nongovernmental organizations.

(c) A person who violates the prohibition of
fundraising on state or county property shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. [L
2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next